Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 4 Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act
8-4-204. Permits — Revocation.

The Division of Environmental Quality or its successor is given and charged with the power and duty to revoke, modify, or suspend, in whole or in part, for cause any permit issued under this chapter, including without limitation:

Violation of any condition of the permit;

Obtaining a permit by misrepresentation or failure to disclose fully all relevant facts; or

A change in any applicable regulation or a change in any preexisting condition affecting the nature of the discharge that requires either a temporary or permanent reduction or elimination of the permitted discharge.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 3; 1975, No. 743, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1904; Acts 1993, No. 163, § 14; 1993, No. 165, § 14; 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 1999, No. 1164, § 21; 2019, No. 910, § 2488.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-4-205. Permits — Hearings upon denial, revocation, or modification and other permit actions — Definition.

Any person that is denied a permit by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or that has a permit revoked or modified or a request for permit transfer or modification denied shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission in connection therewith, upon written application made within thirty (30) days after service of notice of the denial, revocation, or modification.

Only those interested persons, other than the applicant, that have submitted comments on the record regarding a proposed permit action during the public comment period shall have standing to request a hearing by the commission in connection therewith, upon written application made within thirty (30) days after the date of the Division of Environmental Quality's final decision regarding the permit action.

No interested party requesting a hearing under this subsection may raise any issue in the hearing that was not raised in the public comments unless the party raising the issue shows good cause why such issue could not, with reasonable diligence, have been discovered and presented during the public comment period. The limitation in this subdivision (b)(2) shall not restrict the issues that may be addressed by the applicant in any appeal.

A request for a hearing shall identify the permit action in question and its date and must include a complete and detailed statement identifying the legal and factual objections to the permit action.

Within thirty (30) days of the date the request for a hearing is filed with the Secretary of the Arkansas Pollution and Ecology Control Commission, a preliminary hearing will be conducted in the name of the commission by the commission's authorized administrative law judge.

Within a reasonable time after the preliminary hearing, the administrative law judge shall enter a written decision determining whether the parties qualify as proper parties under subdivision (b)(1) of this section and whether the request conforms with the requirements under subdivisions (b)(2) and (3) of this section.

A party aggrieved by the decision entered under this subsection may, within ten (10) business days, request review by the commission.

A contested decision and any final recommended decision of the administrative law judge shall be transmitted to the commission.

The commission shall consider the recommended decision of the administrative law judge and shall either affirm the decision in whole or in part or reverse the decision in whole or in part.

At this preliminary hearing, the administrative law judge shall weigh the equities of any request for expedited review and advance the case on the administrative docket as circumstances permit.

The commission shall review the director's decision de novo.

The administrative law judge shall schedule the hearing and other proceedings so that the appeal will be submitted to the commission for final commission action within one hundred twenty (120) days after the preliminary hearing unless the parties mutually agree to a longer period of time or the administrative law judge establishes a longer period of time for just cause.

During the pendency of the appeal to the commission:

The denial of a permit shall stand;

The issuance, modification, or revocation of a permit or that part of a permit that is the subject of the appeal shall be stayed;

Notwithstanding subdivisions (c)(6)(A) and (B) of this section, upon application by a party, the commission may provide for a stay, modify the terms of a stay, or terminate a stay under appropriate circumstances to avoid substantial prejudice to a party.

As used in subdivision (c)(6)(C)(i) of this section, “substantial prejudice” means that the following will occur to the party seeking a stay, a modification of the terms of a stay, or the termination of a stay if the request is denied:

Actual harm to health; or

Adverse economic impact, including without limitation interruption, curtailment, or deferral of business or increased cost of construction or operation;

Upon application by a party for a stay, to modify the terms of a stay, or to terminate a stay, the Chair of the Arkansas Pollution and Ecology Control Commission shall:

Grant a temporary stay, modify the terms of a stay, or terminate a stay effective until the earlier of the next regularly scheduled commission meeting or the next special meeting called for the purpose of considering the application; or

Place the application on the agenda for the next regularly scheduled commission meeting or call a special commission meeting for the purpose of considering the application if more than thirty (30) days will pass between the receipt of the application and the next regularly scheduled commission meeting; and

Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(6)(D) of this section, the commission shall render a final decision on an application to provide for a stay, modify the terms of a stay, or terminate a stay within thirty (30) days of receipt of the application.

The decision of the commission is final, and only those persons that are parties to the administrative appeal under this section shall have standing to appeal a permitting decision to circuit court as provided for in §§ 8-4-222 — 8-4-229.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; 1973, No. 262, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 1991, No. 744, § 4; 1993, No. 163, § 15; 1993, No. 165, § 15; 1995, No. 384, § 10; 1999, No. 1164, § 22; 2013, No. 1021, § 1; 2015, No. 838, § 4; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2489, 2490.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (c)(6)(C)(ii) through (E).

The 2015 amendment substituted “administrative law judge” for “hearing officer” throughout (c); and substituted “under” for “pursuant to” in (c)(1)(C).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a) and (b)(1).

Cross References.

Administrative procedures and appeals in actions involving hazardous substances, § 8-7-506.

Hazardous substance remedial action trust fund, procedures for appeal, § 8-7-519.

8-4-206. State water pollution control agency — General authority.

In addition to any other powers which it may have under this chapter or any other legislative act, the Division of Environmental Quality is authorized and empowered to act as the “state water pollution control agency” for the State of Arkansas for the purposes of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972.

As the state water pollution control agency, the division may, among other things, approve projects for the construction of disposal systems for the purposes of loans and grants from the United States Environmental Protection Agency or any other federal agency and may take any other action necessary or appropriate to secure for the state the benefits of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 3; Acts 1973, No. 262, § 5; 1975, No. 743, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1904; Acts 1999, No. 1164, § 23; 2019, No. 910, § 2491.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

U.S. Code.

The Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, and the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, referred to in this section, are codified primarily as 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.

8-4-207. State water pollution control agency — Powers and duties generally.

Without limiting the generality of the provisions of this chapter or of the powers which the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may have under this or any other legislative act:

The director is authorized to require conditions in permits issued under this chapter regarding the achievement of effluent limitations based upon the application of such levels of treatment technology and processes as are required under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, or any more stringent effluent limitations necessary to meet water quality criteria or toxic standards established pursuant to any state law or rule or federal law or regulation. Such effluent limitations shall be achieved in the shortest reasonable period of time consistent with state law and the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, and any regulations or guidelines promulgated thereunder.

The director is further authorized to set and revise schedules of compliance and include such schedules within the terms and conditions of the permits and prescribe other terms and conditions for permits issued under this chapter to assure compliance with applicable state and federal effluent limitations and water quality criteria, including requirements concerning recording, reporting, monitoring, entry, inspection, and sampling as provided in this chapter and such other requirements as are consistent with the purposes of this chapter;

The director shall not issue a permit under this chapter if the discharge of any term of the permit would violate the provisions of any federal law or rule or regulation promulgated thereunder, including the duration of such permit;

Permits for publicly owned treatment works shall include as a condition for the permit that the permittee provide information to the director concerning new introductions of pollutants or substantial changes in the volume or character of pollutants, whether sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes are being introduced into such treatment works, and appropriate measures to establish and ensure compliance by industrial users with any system of user charges required under state law or federal law or any federal regulations or guidelines promulgated thereunder;

The director may apply and enforce toxic effluent standards and pretreatment standards against industrial users of publicly owned treatment works for the introduction into the publicly owned treatment works of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes which interfere with, pass through, or otherwise are incompatible with the publicly owned treatment works;

The director and the commission shall ensure public notice, public participation, and an opportunity for public hearing in respect to National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit applications and actions related to them in accordance with applicable state law and rules and federal law, rules, and regulations; and

Any records, reports, or information obtained under this chapter and any permits, permit applications, and related documentation shall be available to the public for inspection and copying.

However, information submitted to the Division of Environmental Quality may be claimed as confidential if its disclosure would divulge trade secrets.

The division shall deny any claim for confidentiality for the name and address of any permit applicant or permittee or for any National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit applications, National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permits, and effluent data.

Information required by National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System application forms, including any information submitted on the forms themselves and any attachments used to supply information required by the forms, shall not be claimed confidential nor afforded this protection.

Any person adversely affected by a determination by the division on a claim of confidentiality may appeal the determination as provided in §§ 8-4-222 and 8-4-223.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 3; 1973, No. 262, § 5; 1975, No. 743, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1904; Acts 1987, No. 617, § 1; 1993, No. 163, § 16; 1993, No. 165, § 16; 1999, No. 1164, § 24; 2019, No. 315, §§ 471-473; 2019, No. 693, § 6; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2492-2495.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “law or rule” in (1)(A); substituted “state law or federal law or any federal regulations” for “state or federal law or any regulations” in (3); and substituted “state law and rules and federal law, rules, and regulations” for “state and federal law and rules and regulations” in (5).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693, in (4), substituted “may” for “is authorized to”, and “the publicly owned” for “such” twice.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language and (6)(A)(ii); and substituted “division” for “department” in (6)(B) and (6)(D).

U.S. Code.

The Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.

8-4-208. State water pollution control agency — Administration of permit program generally.

The Division of Environmental Quality is authorized, subject to the approval of the Governor, to administer on behalf of the state its own permit program for discharges into navigable waters within its jurisdiction in lieu of that of the United States Environmental Protection Agency. The division is also authorized to submit to the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency for approval a full and complete description of the program which the division proposes to establish and administer under state law, as provided by § 402(b) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, 33 U.S.C. § 1342(b). To that end, the division and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission are vested with all necessary authority and power to meet the requirements of § 402(b) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, 33 U.S.C. § 1342(b), and the guidelines promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to § 304(h)(2) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, 33 U.S.C. § 1314(h), to engage in an approved continuing planning process under § 303(e) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, 33 U.S.C. § 1313(e), and to perform any and all acts necessary to carry out the purposes and requirements of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 relating to this state's participation in the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System established under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, subject to all restrictions contained in the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 and guidelines.

The division shall further have the authority to accept a delegation of authority from the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 and to exercise and enforce the authority delegated.

Any public hearing that may be held by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality preliminary to acting on a permit application as required by the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 and guidelines, unless otherwise designated in the notice of hearing, shall be for informational purposes only and shall not be deemed a hearing before the commission within the meaning of § 8-4-205. No appeal may be taken therefrom.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 3; 1973, No. 262, § 5; 1975, No. 743, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1904; Acts 1993, No. 163, § 17; 1993, No. 165, § 17; 1999, No. 1164, § 25; 2019, No. 910, § 2496.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a) and (c); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (a) and in (b).

U.S. Code.

The Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, referred to in this section, are codified primarily as 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.

The guidelines promulgated by the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to § 304(h) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 (33 U.S.C. § 1314(h)), referred to in this section, appear as 40 C.F.R. §
136.1 et seq.

Cross References.

Requirement of disclosure statement from permit applicants, § 8-1-106(b).

8-4-209. State water pollution control agency — Participation of certain persons prohibited in approval of permit applications.

Any provision of state law to the contrary notwithstanding, no member of the Division of Environmental Quality or the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission or other state agency who receives or has during the previous two (2) years received a significant portion of his or her income directly or indirectly from permit holders or applicants for a permit shall participate in the approval of the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit applications or portions thereof.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 2; 1975, No. 743, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1904; 2019, No. 910, § 2497.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-4-210. Investigations and hearings generally.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission is given and charged with the power and duty to conduct such investigations and hold such hearings as it may deem advisable and necessary for the discharge of its duties under this chapter and to authorize any member, employee, or agent appointed by it to conduct such investigations or hold such hearings.

In any such hearing or investigation, any member of the commission or any employee or agent thereto authorized by the commission may administer oaths, examine witnesses, and issue, in the name of the commission, subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence relevant to any matter involved in such hearing or investigation.

Witnesses shall receive the same fees and mileage as in civil actions, to be paid out of funds appropriated to the commission.

In case of contumacy or refusal to obey a subpoena issued under this section or refusal to testify, the circuit court of the county where the proceeding is pending or in which the person guilty of the contumacy or refusal to obey is found or resides shall have jurisdiction, upon application of the commission or its authorized member, employee, agent, or administrative law judge, to issue to the person an order requiring him or her to appear and testify or produce evidence, as the case may require.

A failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt.

In accordance with the powers set forth in subsections (a)-(d) of this section, the commission is authorized to conduct adjudicatory hearings providing an aggrieved person with standing a forum for contesting any decision of the Division of Environmental Quality. For the purposes of such hearings, the commission's jurisdiction shall be construed as including all regulatory programs vested with the division.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1904; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 2015, No. 838, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 2498.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted designations (d)(1) and (d)(2); and substituted “administrative law judge” for “hearing officer” in (d)(1).

The 2019 amendment, in (e), substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the first sentence and substituted “division” for “department” at the end of the second sentence.

8-4-211. Declaratory orders.

Any permittee or person subject to regulation may petition the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission for a declaratory order as to the application of any rule, statute, permit, or order enforced by the Division of Environmental Quality or the commission.

Such petitions shall be processed for adjudicatory review in the same manner as appeals under the procedures prescribed by §§ 8-1-203, 8-4-205, 8-4-212, and 8-4-218 — 8-4-229.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 3; 1961, No. 120, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1904; Acts 1995, No. 384, § 4; 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 2499.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a).

8-4-212. Adjudicatory hearings and orders.

No final order resolving a contested decision of the Division of Environmental Quality shall be issued until the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission has provided aggrieved persons that have standing the opportunity for an adjudicatory hearing upon the matter.

Any person that will be directly affected by the order shall have the right to be heard at the hearing, to submit evidence, and to be represented by counsel.

Written notice specifying the time and place of the hearing shall be served by the commission in the manner provided by § 8-4-214 upon all persons known by it to be directly affected by the order, not less than ten (10) days before the date of the hearing.

A copy of any order issued by the commission after the hearing shall also be served upon the persons.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 2500.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a).

8-4-213. Conclusiveness of commission actions.

If no appeal is taken from an order, a rule, or other decision of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission as provided in §§ 8-4-222 — 8-4-229, or if the action of the commission is affirmed on appeal, then the action of the commission in the matter shall be deemed conclusive, and the validity and reasonableness thereof shall not be questioned in any other action or proceeding.

However, this section shall not preclude the authority of the commission to modify or rescind its actions.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 1993, No. 163, § 18; 1993, No. 165, § 18; 2019, No. 315, § 474.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “a regulation” following “rule” in (a).

8-4-214. Service of notice, orders, etc.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, any notice, order, or other instrument issued by or under authority of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may be served upon any person affected thereby, personally or by publication. Proof of the service may be made in like manner as in the case of service of a summons in a civil action, with the proof to be filed in the office of the commission.

Service may be had by mailing a copy of the notice, order, or other instrument, by certified mail, directed to the person affected at his or her last known post office address as shown by the files or records of the commission. Proof of the mailing may be made by the affidavit of the person that did the mailing, filed in the office of the commission.

Service by publication shall be accomplished by one (1) insertion in a newspaper of general circulation in the area affected.

Every certificate or affidavit of service made and filed as provided in this section shall be prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated, and a certified copy thereof shall have like force and effect.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906.

8-4-215. Intergovernmental cooperation.

The Division of Environmental Quality or its successor and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, so far as it is not inconsistent with its duties under the laws of this state, may assist and cooperate with any agency of another state or the United States in any matter relating to water pollution control.

The commission or the division may receive and accept money, property, or services from any person or from any agency described in subsection (a) of this section or from any other source for any water pollution control purpose within the scope of its functions under this chapter.

All moneys so received shall be used for the operation and activities of the commission or division and for no other purposes.

The division or its successor may enter into agreements with the responsible authorities of the United States or other states, subject to approval by the Governor, relative to policies, methods, means, and procedures to be employed to control pollution of any interstate waters and may carry out these agreements by appropriate general and special orders.

This power shall not be deemed to extend to the modification of any agreement with any other state concluded by direct legislative act.

However, unless otherwise provided, the division shall be the agency for the administration and enforcement of any such legislative agreement.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 6; 1973, No. 262, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1907; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 1999, No. 1164, § 26; 2019, No. 910, § 2501.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (b) and (c).

8-4-216. Information and inspections.

The owner or operator of or any contributor of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes to any disposal system or an industrial user of a publicly owned treatment system, when requested by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, shall furnish to the Division of Environmental Quality any information that is relevant to the subject of this chapter. The owner or operator shall establish and maintain such records, make such reports, install, use, and maintain such monitoring equipment or methods, including, when appropriate, biological monitoring methods, sample such effluents, and provide such other information as the director may reasonably require.

The division or any authorized employee or agent of the division may examine and copy any book, papers, records, or memoranda pertaining to the operation of a disposal system.

Whenever it shall be necessary for the purpose of this chapter, the division or any authorized member, employee, or agent of the division may enter upon any public or private property for the purpose of obtaining information or conducting surveys or investigations.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 4; 1973, No. 262, § 6; 1975, No. 743, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1905; Acts 1999, No. 1164, § 27; 2019, No. 910, § 2502.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” twice in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” twice in (b) and twice in (c).

8-4-217. Unlawful actions.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

Cause pollution, as defined in § 8-4-102, of any of the waters of this state;

Place or cause to be placed any sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes in a location where it is likely to cause pollution of any waters of this state;

Violate any provisions of this chapter or of any rule or order adopted by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission under this chapter or of a permit issued under this chapter by the Division of Environmental Quality;

Knowingly to make any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under this chapter;

Falsify, tamper with, or knowingly render inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained under this chapter; or

Sell, offer or expose for sale, give, or furnish any synthetic detergent or detergent containing any phosphorus, expressed as elemental phosphorus, including synthetic detergents or detergents manufactured for use as laundry or dishwashing detergents within this state from and after January 1, 1994, except as provided below:

Products that may be used, sold, manufactured, or distributed for use or sale regardless of phosphorus content include:

A detergent:

Used in dairy, beverage, or food processing cleaning equipment;

Used in hospitals, veterinary hospitals, clinics, healthcare facilities, or in agricultural production;

Used by industry for metal cleaning or reconditioning;

Manufactured, stored, or distributed for use or sale outside the state;

Used in any laboratory, including a biological laboratory, research facility, chemical laboratory, and engineering laboratory;

Used in a commercial laundry that provides laundry services for a hospital, healthcare facility, or veterinary hospital; or

Used for surface cleaning, appliance cleaning, or specialty home cleaning, and not for dishwashing or laundry;

A phosphoric acid product, including a sanitizer, brightener, acid cleaner, or metal conditioner; and

A substance the division excludes from the phosphorus limitations of this section based on a finding that compliance with this section would:

Create a significant hardship on the user; or

Be unreasonable because of the lack of an adequate substitute cleaning agent that could be substituted for the subject cleaning agent without significant cost or effect differences;

A person may use, sell, manufacture, or distribute for use or sale a laundry detergent that contains five-tenths percent (.5%) phosphorus or less that is incidental to manufacturing; and

A person may use, sell, manufacture, or distribute for use or sale a dishwashing detergent that contains eight and seven-tenths percent (8.7%) phosphorus or less by weight.

It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in any of the following acts without having first obtained a written permit from the division:

To construct, install, modify, or operate any disposal system or any part thereof, or any extension or addition thereto, that will discharge into any of the waters of this state;

To increase in volume or strength any sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes in excess of the permissive discharges specified under any existing permit;

To construct, install, or operate any building, plant, works, establishment, or facility, or any extension or modification thereof, or addition thereto, the operation of which would result in discharge of any wastes into the waters of this state or would otherwise alter the physical, chemical, or biological properties of any waters of this state in any manner not already lawfully authorized;

To construct or use any new outlet for the discharge of any wastes into the waters of this state; or

To discharge sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes into any of the waters of this state.

The division may require the submission of such plans, specifications, and other information as it deems relevant in connection with the issuance of disposal permits.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 8; 1961, No. 120, § 7; 1973, No. 262, § 9; 1975, No. 743, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1908; Acts 1993, No. 454, § 1; 1993, No. 461, § 1; 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 2019, No. 315, § 475; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2503-2506.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As originally amended by identical Acts 1993, Nos. 454 and 461, § 1, subdivisions (a)(6)(B) and (a)(6)(C) began “After January 1, 1994.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(3); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-4-218. Violations of chapter, orders, rules, etc. — Hearings — Notice.

Whenever the Division of Environmental Quality or its successor determines that there are reasonable grounds to believe that there has been a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or any order or rule of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, it may give written notice to the alleged violator specifying the causes of complaint.

The notice shall require that the matters that are the causes of complaint be corrected or that the alleged violator appear before the commission at a time and place specified in the notice and answer the charges that are the causes of complaint.

The notice shall be served upon the alleged violator in accordance with the provisions of § 8-4-214 not less than ten (10) days before the time set for the hearing.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; 1961, No. 120, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 1999, No. 1164, § 28; 2013, No. 1127, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 476; 2019, No. 910, § 2507.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “that are the causes of complaint” for “complained of” twice in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “or rule” for “rule or regulation” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a).

8-4-219. Violations of chapter, orders, rules, etc. — Hearings — Conduct.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall afford an opportunity for a fair hearing to the alleged violator at the time and place specified in the notice or any modification of the notice.

A hearing may be conducted by the commission or its administrative law judge, who shall have the power and authority to conduct hearings in the name of the commission at any time and place.

A record or summary of the proceedings of the hearings shall be taken and filed at the office of the commission.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; 1961, No. 120, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 2015, No. 838, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment substituted “administrative law judge” for “hearing officer” in (b).

8-4-220. Violation of chapter, orders, rules, etc. — Order of division without hearing.

When the Division of Environmental Quality or its successor finds that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health or welfare it may, without notice or hearing, issue an order reciting the existence of such emergency and requiring that such action be taken as it deems necessary to meet the emergency.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 8-4-218 and 8-4-219, the order shall be effective immediately.

Any person to which the order is directed shall comply immediately but, on application to the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, shall be afforded a hearing within ten (10) days after receipt of a written request therefor.

On the basis of the hearing, the commission shall continue the order in effect, revoke it, or modify it.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; 1961, No. 120, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 5; 1999, No. 1164, § 29; 2019, No. 910, § 2508.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a).

8-4-221. Violations of chapter, orders, rules, etc. — Hearing — Orders.

On the basis of the evidence produced at the hearing, the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall enter such order as in its opinion will best further the purposes of this chapter. A copy of the order shall be served upon the alleged violator and on such other persons as shall have appeared at the hearing and made written request for notice of the order, in the manner provided by § 8-4-214. The order of the commission shall become final and binding on all parties unless appealed, as provided in §§ 8-4-222 — 8-4-229, within thirty (30) days after service of the order.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; 1961, No. 120, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 1993, No. 163, § 19; 1993, No. 165, § 19.

8-4-222. Appeals — Entitlement.

An appeal may be taken from a final order, rule, regulation, or other final determination of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission under §§ 8-4-223 — 8-4-229 by those parties that have standing and have exhausted their administrative appeals.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 1993, No. 163, § 20; 1993, No. 165, § 20;
2013, No. 1021, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted “under §§ 8-4-223 — 8-4-229” and deleted “to the circuit court of the county in which the business, industry, municipality, or thing involved is situated, in the manner provided in §§ 8-4-223 — 8-4-229” at the end.

8-4-223. Appeals — Notice.

Within thirty (30) days after service of a copy of the final order, rule, or other final determination of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, the appellant may file a notice of appeal with the circuit court of the county in which the business, industry, municipality, or thing involved is situated.

A copy of the notice of appeal shall be served upon the Secretary of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission by personal delivery or by mail with a return receipt requested within ten (10) days of filing with the circuit court.

The notice of appeal:

Shall state the action of the commission appealed from;

Shall specify the grounds of the appeal, including points of both law and fact that are asserted or questioned by the appellant; and

May contain any other allegations or denials of fact pertinent to the appeal.

The notice of appeal shall state an address within the state at which service of a response to the notice of appeal and other papers in the matter may be made upon the appellant.

Upon filing the notice of appeal with the clerk of the circuit court, the circuit court shall have jurisdiction of the appeal.

Within ten (10) business days of service of the notice of appeal required under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the owner or operator of the business, industry, municipality, or thing involved may file a motion to transfer the appeal from the circuit court to the Court of Appeals.

Upon the filing of a motion under subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the appeal shall be transferred from the circuit court to the Court of Appeals.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 472, [Part 1], § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1906; Acts 1997, No. 896, § 1; 1997, No. 1219, § 5;
2013, No. 1021, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 477.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (d).

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a)(1).